District of Columbia statutes.
42-3631

Definitions.

Expired.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 2, 37 DCR 2645
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-176, § 2(a), 43 DCR 4234

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2559.1.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Abatement of Controlled Dangerous Substances Nuisance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-158, October 7, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 7576).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Drug House Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-446, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6664).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Abatement of Controlled Dangerous Substances Nuisances Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-376, June 5, 1998, 45 DCR 4461), § 2 of the Abatement of Controlled Dangerous Substances Nuisances Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-424, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5680), and § 2 of the Abatement of Controlled Dangerous Substances Nuisances Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-513, November 18, 1998, 45 DCR 9047).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 8-139

Section 12(b) of D.C. Law 8-139 provided that the act shall expire 10 years after the effective date of the act. D.C. Law 8-139 became effective on June 13, 1990.